Alabama, session 2026rs, SB322.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. Section 13A-7-4.3, Code of Alabama 1975, as
last amended by Act 2025-64, 2025 Regular Session, is amended
to read as follows:
"§13A-7-4.3
(a) For the purposes of this section, the following
terms have the following meanings:
Page 1

terms have the following meanings:
SB322 INTRODUCED
(1) CRITICAL INFRASTRUCTURE. A system or asset, whether
physical or virtual, so vital to the United States that the
incapacity or destruction of the system or asset would have a
debilitating impact on security, national economic security,
national public health, or national public safety.
(2) CRITICAL INFRASTRUCTURE FACILITY. The term
includes, but is not limited to, any of the following,
including any critical infrastructure located on or in any of
the following types of facilities:
a. A chemical, polymer, or rubber manufacturing
facility.
b. A pipeline.
c. A refinery.
d. An electrical power generating facility.
e. The area surrounding an electrical power generating
facility.
f. An electrical transmission tower.
g. An electrical substation or distribution substation.
h. An electric utility control center.
i. Electrical communication equipment.
j. An electrical switching station.
k. Electric power lines, power storage equipment, or
other utility equipment.
l. Any portion of a public water system or public
wastewater treatment system, except for any reservoir that
meets the definition of public waters pursuant to Section
9-11-80.
m. A natural gas transmission compressor station.
Page 2

m. A natural gas transmission compressor station.
SB322 INTRODUCED
n. A liquefied natural gas (LNG) terminal or storage
facility.
o. A natural gas distribution facility, including, but
not limited to, a pipeline interconnection, a city gate or
town border station, a metering station, aboveground piping, a
regular station, or a natural gas or hydrocarbon storage or
production facility.
p. A mining operation.
q. Beneficiation infrastructure or mining
infrastructure.
r. A transportation facility such as a port, airport,
railroad operating facility, or trucking terminal.
s. Communications service infrastructure or facilities,
as defined under Section 37-17-1.
t. A gas processing plant, including a plant used in
the processing, treatment, or fractionation of natural gas or
natural gas liquids.
u. A steelmaking facility that uses an electric arc
furnace.
v. A dam that is regulated by the state or federal
government.
w. A crude oil or refined products storage or
distribution facility, including, but not limited to, a valve
site, a pipeline interconnection, a pump station, a metering
station, below ground piping, above ground piping, or a truck
loading or offloading facility.
x. A defense contractor facility.
y. A pulp and paper manufacturing facility.
Page 3

y. A pulp and paper manufacturing facility.
SB322 INTRODUCED
(3) FRAUDULENT DOCUMENTS FOR IDENTIFICATION PURPOSES. A
document that is presented as being a bona fide document that
provides personal identification information but which, in
fact, is false, forged, altered, or counterfeit.
(4) PERSON. An individual, trust, estate, corporation,
partnership, limited partnership, limited liability
partnership, limited liability company, or unincorporated
nonprofit association having a separate legal existence under
state law.
(5) UNMANNED AIRCRAFT SYSTEM. A powered, aerial vehicle
that does not carry a human operator, uses aerodynamic forces
to provide vehicle lift, may fly autonomously through an
onboard computer or be piloted remotely, and may be expendable
or recoverable. The term does not include a satellite orbiting
the Earth or a spacecraft beyond Earth's atmosphere and may
100 not be construed to implicate the provider of a
101 telecommunications link between an owner or operator of an
102 unmanned aircraft system and the unmanned aircraft system.
103 (b) A person commits the crime of unauthorized entry of
104 a critical infrastructure facility if the person does any of
105 the following:
106 (1) Intentionally enters without authority into any
107 structure or onto any premises belonging to another that
108 constitutes in whole or in part a critical infrastructure
109 facility that is completely enclosed by any type of physical
110 barrier or clearly marked with a sign or signs that are posted
111 in a conspicuous manner and indicate that unauthorized entry
112 is forbidden.
Page 4

is forbidden.
SB322 INTRODUCED
113 (2) Uses or attempts to use a fraudulent document for
114 identification for the purpose of entering a critical
115 infrastructure facility.
116 (3) Remains on the premises of a critical
117 infrastructure facility after having been forbidden to do so,
118 either orally or in writing, by any owner, lessee, or
119 custodian of the property or by any other authorized person.
120 (4) Intentionally enters into a restricted area of a
121 critical infrastructure facility which is marked as a
122 restricted or limited access area, or which is completely
123 enclosed by any type of physical barrier, when the person is
124 not authorized to enter the restricted or limited access area.
125 (c) A person who commits the crime of unauthorized
126 entry of a critical infrastructure facility is guilty of a
127 Class A misdemeanor.
128 (d) If a person intentionally, recklessly, or with
129 criminal negligence injures, removes, destroys, or breaks
130 critical infrastructure property, or otherwise interrupts or
131 interferes with the operations of a critical infrastructure
132 asset, the person is guilty of a Class C felony.
133 (e) A person who commits the crime of unauthorized
134 entry of a critical infrastructure facility while possessing
135 or operating an unmanned aircraft system with an attached
136 weapon, firearm, explosive, destructive device, or ammunition
137 is guilty of a Class C felony.
138 (f) Nothing in this section shall be construed to
139 prevent lawful assembly and peaceful and orderly petition for
140 the redress of grievances, including, but not limited to, any
Page 5

the redress of grievances, including, but not limited to, any
SB322 INTRODUCED
141 labor dispute between any employer and its employee.
142 (g) Nothing in this section shall be construed to
143 prohibit the state, a county, or a municipality from taking
144 any lawful action on their respective rights-of-way.
145 (h) Nothing in subsection (b) or (d) shall apply to any
146 act committed by a person within the scope of his or her
147 employment. For purposes of this subsection, the scope of a
148 person's employment shall include the performance of actions
149 that are necessary for the performance of a lawful work
150 assignment."
151 Section 2. This act shall become effective on October
152 1, 2026.
Page 6